Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 2 Manufactured Homes

Cross references.

Ad valorem taxation of mobile homes, §

48-5-440

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for manufactured homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Office of Commissioner of Insurance, Chapter 120-3-7.

Uniform procedures for mobile homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Local Government Services Division, Chapter 560-11-9.

8-2-130.
Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Uniform Standards Code for Manufactured Homes Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-130

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 1, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-131.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Installer” means a person responsible for performing an installation and who is required to obtain a license pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 8-2-160.

“Lending institutions” means lenders that acquire manufactured or mobile homes incident to their regular business, including national and state chartered banks, federal and state chartered credit unions, lenders that are licensed under Article 13 of Chapter 1 of Title 7, and lenders that are involved in manufactured or mobile home chattel lending.

“Manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein; except that such term shall include any structure which meets all the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the secretary of housing and urban development and complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

“Manufacturer” means any person who constructs or assembles manufactured homes.

“Mobile home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, which, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein and manufactured prior to June 15, 1976.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal entity but shall not include a trust or the state or any political subdivision thereof.

“Retail broker” means any person engaged in the business of selling or offering for sale to consumers three or more new or used manufactured or mobile homes in a 12 month period and who does not maintain a display of manufactured or mobile homes. As used in this paragraph, the terms “selling” and “sale” include lease-purchase transactions, and the term “retail broker” does not include lending institutions.

“Retailer” means any person engaged in the business of selling or offering for sale to consumers three or more new or used manufactured or mobile homes in a 12 month period and who maintains a display of manufactured or mobile homes. As used in this paragraph, the terms “selling” and “sale” include lease-purchase transactions, and the term “retailer” does not include lending institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 2; Code 1981, §

8-2-131

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 3, 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 8/HB 90.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, a comma was deleted following “entity” in paragraph (7).

8-2-132.
Authority of Commissioner; policy and purpose.

The Commissioner is authorized and empowered to contract or enter into cooperative agreements with any agency, department, or instrumentality of the United States; any agency, board, department, or commission of the state; any county, municipality, or local government of the state, or any combination of same; any public or private corporation or firm, or any persons whatsoever; or any public authority, agency, commission, or institution to participate in the enforcement of manufactured home construction and safety standards which may be promulgated pursuant to the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.; provided, however, that the Commissioner shall notify the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development by July 1 of his or her intention to terminate any such contract or agreement, which termination shall become effective on July 1 of the following year.

It is the policy of this state and purpose of this part to forbid the manufacture and sale of new manufactured homes which are not constructed in accordance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

The Commissioner is authorized and empowered to issue and promulgate all rules and procedures which in his or her judgment are necessary and desirable to make effective the construction standards established by the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 879, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-132

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, in subsection (a), “corporation or” was substituted for “corporation,” near the beginning and “agreement, which” was substituted for “agreement which” near the end.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for manufactured homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, Chapter 120-3-7.

8-2-133.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by Commissioner; making of investigations and inspections.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-132, the Commissioner may make, amend, alter, and repeal general rules and regulations of procedure to carry into effect this part, to obtain statistical data concerning manufactured homes, and to prescribe means, methods, and practices to make this part effective. The Commissioner may also make such investigations and inspections as in his or her judgment are necessary to enforce and administer this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 7; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 7; Code 1981, §

8-2-133

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-134.
Manufacture and sale of manufactured homes constructed and assembled in accordance with rules issued by Commissioner.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-132, no person may manufacture, sell, or offer for sale any manufactured home unless such manufactured home and its components, systems, and appliances have been constructed and assembled in accordance with rules issued by the Commissioner with respect to the construction, assembly, and sale of such manufactured homes and unless compliance with such rules is shown in the manner required by the Commissioner’s rules.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 4; Code 1981, §

8-2-134

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Pursuant to the authority granted by Code Section 8-2-132, the Safety Fire Commissioner has promulgated rules pertaining to the construction of mobile homes. These rules are designated as Ch. 120-3-7 of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia and are on file in the Office of the Comptroller General.

8-2-135.
Licenses for manufacturers who build, sell, or offer for sale manufactured homes in state; licenses for dealers of manufactured or mobile homes.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-132:

Every manufacturer who manufactures manufactured homes outside the State of Georgia and who sells or offers for sale a manufactured home in Georgia shall apply for and obtain a license;

Every manufacturer who manufactures manufactured homes in Georgia shall apply for and obtain a license;

Every retailer and retail broker who sells or offers for sale new or used manufactured homes or mobile homes in Georgia shall apply for and obtain a license;

Applications for licenses and renewal licenses shall be obtained from the Commissioner and submitted on or before January 1 of each year. All applicants shall certify in the application that all construction, electrical, heating, and plumbing standards will be complied with as set forth in this part and in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner; and

The license and renewal license fee shall be $440.00 per manufacturing plant which manufactures manufactured homes within the State of Georgia; $440.00 per out-of-state manufacturing plant which manufactures manufactured homes for the purpose of offering for sale, or having such homes sold, within the State of Georgia; and $300.00 per retailer location and retail broker which sells, offers for sale, or transports to sell such homes within the State of Georgia. The license shall be valid from January 1 through December 31 of the year in which it was issued. The fee for delinquent renewal applications received after January 10 of each year shall be double the regular annual renewal fee.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 5; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-135

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 456, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2725, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2750, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-19/HB 1055.

8-2-135.1.
Manufacturing inspection fee; reinspection; monitoring inspection fee.

During such time as the Commissioner’s office is acting as the primary inspection agency pursuant to Section 623 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., or the regulations issued thereunder, every manufacturer who manufactures manufactured homes in Georgia shall pay to the Commissioner a manufacturing inspection fee for each manufactured home manufactured in Georgia, irrespective of whether the manufactured home is offered for sale in this state. This manufacturing inspection fee shall be $30.00 for each certification label, as defined in Section 623 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq. For any reinspection, a $15.00 additional fee shall be charged.

During such time as the Commissioner’s office is acting as the state administrative agency pursuant to Section 623 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., a monitoring inspection fee paid by each manufacturer in Georgia for each manufactured home manufactured in this state shall be paid to the secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or to the secretary’s agent for distribution in accordance with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-135.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-20/HB 1055.

8-2-136.
Records and reports of manufactured home manufacturers, retailers, retail brokers, and installers; inspection of such books and records.

Each manufacturer, retailer, retail broker, and installer of manufactured homes shall establish and maintain such records, make such reports, and provide such information as the Commissioner or the secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development may reasonably require in order to be able to determine whether the manufacturer, retailer, retail broker, or installer has acted or is acting in compliance with this part or with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq. Upon the request of a person duly designated by the Commissioner or the secretary of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, each manufacturer, retailer, retail broker, and installer shall permit that person to inspect appropriate books, papers, records, and documents relevant to determining whether the manufacturer, retailer, retail broker, or installer has acted or is acting in compliance with this part or with the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, § 2; Code 1981, §

8-2-136

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-137.
Conduct of hearings and presentations of views; dispute resolution program.

Any hearing conducted under the provisions of this chapter or of the rules and regulations promulgated under this part shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The Commissioner shall be authorized to determine by regulation the manner in which he or she will conduct presentations of views as required during his or her participation as the state administrative agency pursuant to the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.

The Commissioner may, through regulations, establish a dispute resolution program in compliance with 42 U.S.C. Section 5422, the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 8; Code 1981, §

8-2-137

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 5, 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 6; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “Manufactured Housing” was substituted for “Mobile Home” in subsection (b).

8-2-138.
Alterations or modifications in manufactured homes by retailers, retail brokers, or installers.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-132, retailers, retail brokers, and installers are expressly prohibited from altering or modifying any manufactured home certified under this part and under the rules and regulations of the Commissioner, except that alterations, changes, or modifications may be made by retailers, retail brokers, or installers certified to make such alterations, changes, or modifications in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 9; Code 1981, §

8-2-138

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-139.
Interfering with representative of Commissioner in performance of duties; entry and inspection of premises where manufactured homes are manufactured or sold.

No person may interfere with, obstruct, or hinder an authorized representative of the Commissioner who displays proper department credentials in the performance of his or her duties as set forth in this part.

The Commissioner or any of his or her authorized representatives, upon showing proper credentials and in the discharge of their duties pursuant to this part, are authorized during regular business hours and without advance notice to enter and inspect all facilities, warehouses, or establishments in the State of Georgia in which manufactured homes are manufactured.

The Commissioner or any of his or her authorized representatives, upon showing proper credentials and in the discharge of their duties pursuant to this part, are authorized during regular business hours and without advance notice to enter upon and inspect all premises in the State of Georgia in which manufactured homes are being sold.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 10; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, § 3; Code 1981, §

8-2-139

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-140.
Power of authorized representative of Commissioner to stop and inspect manufactured homes in transit.

Any authorized representative of the Commissioner may, upon displaying proper department credentials, stop and inspect any new manufactured home in transit in order to ascertain if the manufactured home complies with this part and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, provided that the manufactured home has been manufactured in this state or has been transported into this state for the purpose of sale within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 11; Code 1981, §

8-2-140

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of law enforcement officers to stop vehicles for purposes of determining compliance with vehicle size, weight, and other laws, §

32-6-30

.

8-2-141.
Monetary penalty; injunctive relief.

During such time as the Commissioner has contracted or entered into cooperative agreements pursuant to his or her authority under Code Section 8-2-132, any retailer, retail broker, or manufacturer who fails to apply for or obtain a license as required by Code Section 8-2-135 or who fails to remit the appropriate license fee as stated in Code Section 8-2-135 shall be subject to a monetary penalty not to exceed $100.00 for each day that such violation persists, except that the maximum monetary penalty shall not exceed $20,000.00 for any one violation.

Any such monetary penalty may be imposed by the Commissioner after notice and opportunity for hearing as provided under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” The amount of such penalty may be collected by the Commissioner in the same manner that money judgments are now enforced in the superior courts of this state.

In addition to any such monetary penalty, the Commissioner may bring a civil action to enjoin any violation of Code Section 8-2-135, and it shall not be necessary for the Commissioner to allege or prove the absence of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 6; Ga. L. 1974, p. 491, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-141

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 4, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

8-2-142.
Adjustment of taxes, license fees, or other fees imposed on foreign manufacturers domiciled in states which impose higher taxes, license fees, or other fees on Georgia-domiciled manufacturers.

If any state or foreign country imposes upon Georgia-domiciled manufactured home manufacturers (or upon their agents or representatives) any taxes, licenses, or other fees in the aggregate, or any fines, penalties, or other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions, for the privilege of doing business in that state or country, which costs, obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions are in excess of similar costs, obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions imposed by the State of Georgia upon manufactured home manufacturers (or their agents or representatives) which are domiciled in that state or foreign country and which are doing business or are seeking to do business in the State of Georgia, then so long as that state or foreign country continues to impose such costs, obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions upon Georgia-domiciled manufactured home manufacturers (or their agents or representatives), the State of Georgia shall impose upon manufactured home manufacturers (or their agents or representatives) which are domiciled in that state or foreign country and which are doing business or are seeking to do business in Georgia the same costs, obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions which are imposed by that state or foreign country on Georgia-domiciled manufactured home manufacturers (or their agents or representatives) which are doing business or seeking to do business in that state or foreign country. Any tax, license, or other fee or other obligation imposed by any city, county, or other political subdivision or agency of such other state or country on manufactured home manufacturers domiciled in Georgia (or their agents or representatives) shall be deemed to be imposed by such state or country within the meaning of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1557, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-142

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, which forms the basis for this part, was amended by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1557, § 1, which added a “Section 12A” to the 1973 Act. The 1973 Act was also amended by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, § 5, which again added a “Section 12A” to the 1973 Act. It does not appear that the later Section 12A was intended to amend or supersede the earlier Section 12A, and both have been codified, the 1975 amendment as Code Section 8-2-142, the 1979 amendment as Code Section 8-2-143.

8-2-143.
Civil and criminal penalty for violation of Section 610 of National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 and regulations and final orders issued thereunder.

Civil penalties. Any person in this state who violates any provision of Section 610 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., or any regulation or final order issued thereunder, shall be liable to the State of Georgia for a civil penalty not to exceed the maximum civil penalty set forth in 24 C.F.R. Section 3282.10 for each such violation. Each violation of 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., or of any regulation or order issued thereunder shall constitute a separate violation with respect to each manufactured home or with respect to each failure or refusal to allow or perform an act required thereby, except that the maximum civil penalty may not exceed the maximum civil penalty set forth in 24 C.F.R. Section 3282.10 for any related series of violations occurring within one year from the date of the first violation.

Criminal penalties. An individual or a director, officer, or agent of a corporation who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of Section 610 of the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq., in a manner which threatens the health or safety of any purchaser shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or be imprisoned for not more than 12 months, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 415, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, §§ 4, 5; Code 1981, §

8-2-143

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1376, §§ 2, 7; Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 401, § 1/SB 445.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (a), substituted “the maximum civil penalty set forth in 24 C.F.R. Section 3282.10” for “$1,000.00” in the first sentence and for “$1 million” in the second sentence, and substituted “42 U.S.C. Section 5401, et seq.,” for “Section 610 of the aforementioned act” near the beginning of the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “Manufactured Housing” was substituted for “Mobile Home” in subsections (a) and (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 4, which forms the basis for this part, was amended by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1557, § 1, which added a “Section 12A” to the 1973 Act. The 1973 Act was also amended by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1286, § 5, which again added a “Section 12A” to the 1973 Act. It does not appear that the later Section 12A was intended to amend or supersede the earlier Section 12A, and both have been codified, the 1975 amendment as Code Section 8-2-142, the 1979 amendment as Code Section 8-2-143.

8-2-144.
Reporting and accounting for fees.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall file a report on or before December 15 of each year accounting for all fees received by the Commissioner under this part and Part 3 of this article for the preceding 12 month period and for the actual costs of the inspection programs under this part and Part 3 of this article for the preceding 12 month period. Such report shall be provided to the chairpersons of the House Appropriations Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee, the House Governmental Affairs Committee, and the Senate Regulated Industries and Utilities Committee, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, the director of the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the director of the House Budget and Research Office.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-144

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-2/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 8/SB 340.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “for the preceding 12 month period” following “inspection programs” was deleted.